California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

Customary or established use as graziers, otherwise than under operation of law, as used in this article, includes the continuously open, notorious, peaceable and public use of such range, seasonally, for a period of five years or longer immediately prior to August 21, 1933, excepting adverse climatic conditions, by the person or his grantors or predecessors in interest except in cases where initiated without protest or conflict to prior use or occupancy thereof. Any change in such customary use so established shall not be made hereafter so as to prevent, restrict or interfere with the customary or established use of any other person or persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

This article shall not be construed to prohibit any such established user from continuing his grazing use, as established in accordance with such customs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8505.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, and independently of the penalty therefor, is liable to any person injured for all damages sustained by reason of such violation, and for such exemplary damages as the circumstances may warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8506.

The violation of any provision of this article may be restrained by injunction, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, pursuant to the provisions of law and principles of equity relating to injunctions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8507.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit free transit over and rights in the public domain where such are provided by the acts of Congress.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8508.

This article is an exercise of the police power of the State, for the protection of the economic welfare and peace of the people of the State, and all of its provisions shall be liberally construed for the accomplishment of its purposes. Nothing in this article shall be construed as amending or repealing existing law regarding the grazing use of the public lands or of water for the purpose of watering livestock or as modifying or compromising any valid rights or priorities as may exist therein at the time of its enactment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cooperation with Federal Agencies in Relation to Grazing Lands [8551. - 8558.]

8551.

An act of Congress entitled “An act to stop injury to the public grazing lands by preventing overgrazing and soil deterioration, to provide for their orderly use, improvement and development, to stabilize the livestock industry dependent upon the public range, and for other purposes,” approved June 28, 1934, provides for the cooperation of the Secretary of the Interior of the United States with State and other officials and associations, and for the payment of certain money by the Secretary of the Interior to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1066.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.

The State Lands Commission may cooperate with the Secretary of the Interior, and may, in the name of the State, exchange lands in the manner and under the conditions prescribed in Section 8 of the Act of Congress cited in Section 8551 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1383.)
-------------------------------------------

8553.

The State Lands Commission is hereby designated the “State land officials” referred to in Section 9 of the Act of Congress cited in Section 8551 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1383.)
-------------------------------------------

8554.

The Department of Fish and Game is hereby designated the “official state agency engaged in the conservation or propagation of wild life” referred to in Section 9 of the act of Congress cited in Section 8551 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

8555.

All moneys received by the State of California from the government of the United States pursuant to the act referred to in Section 8551, or pursuant to any other act of Congress providing for the distribution and payment to states and territories of a fixed and definite percentage of the moneys received by the government of the United States from grazing lands or districts acquired or established therein by the government of the United States or by any officer or instrumentality thereof, shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the United States Grazing Fees Fund, which is hereby established in the State Treasury. That money shall be disposed of, in accordance with the terms of that act of Congress, by the payment of that money to the counties in which those grazing lands or districts are situated. The payments made to each county from the receipts of any given parcel of grazing lands or of any grazing district shall be allocated in accordance with a payment schedule that distributes the payments in the same manner and basis upon which the fees were collected, as officially established by the Secretary of the Interior or other authorized official of the government of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

8556.

The State Controller shall keep a record of the receipts from the Government of the United States on account of Federal grazing lands or districts situated in each county in this State. On or before the thirtieth day of June of each year, the State Controller shall draw his warrant in favor of the treasurer of each and every county entitled to payment hereunder for whatever sum of money may be due to such county according to the provisions of this article, and the State Treasurer shall pay the warrants so drawn. All moneys now or hereafter deposited in the United States Grazing Fees Fund under the provisions of this article are hereby appropriated to be apportioned and paid to the counties of this State as herein provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1383.)
-------------------------------------------

8557.

Any State or county offices or agency, or any stockmen’s association, whether incorporated or unincorporated, or any person, firm, corporation, or association may enter into cooperative agreements with the Secretary of the Interior for the purpose of carrying out the provision and policy of the Act of Congress cited in Section 8551 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1383.)
-------------------------------------------

8557.5.

Any money deposited in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 10 of the act of Congress referred to in Section 8551 of this code and apportioned to any county or counties of this State as herein provided shall be expended by and within each of such counties solely for range improvements and for control of predators; and it shall be the duty of the county auditor of any county receiving a payment of such money immediately to credit the same to an account in the proper fund on his books earmarked and available only for expenditures for range improvements and for control of predators.

There is in each county in which there are public lands leased to five or more lessees under Section 15 of the act referred to in Section 8551 of this code a grazing advisory board. The members of such board shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county. The members of the committee shall be selected from candidates recommended by the lessees of land in the county under Section 15 of the act referred to in Section 8551 of this code at an election conducted in the manner prescribed by rule and regulation of the board of supervisors of the county. There shall be not less than five nor more than 12 such lessees on such committee and there shall be one additional member to represent the interests of wildlife conservation. The terms of the members of the committee shall be three years except that of the members first appointed the terms shall be arranged so that those of one-third of the members, as nearly as may be, will expire at the end of the first, second, and third years, respectively. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be for the unexpired term. The members of the advisory grazing board shall receive no compensation and no reimbursement for any personal expenses. Said board shall meet at least once annually and shall recommend to the board of supervisors plans or projects of range development and predator control for which money derived from leases under Section 15 of the act referred to in Section 8551 of this code is to be expended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1881.)
-------------------------------------------

8558.

Any money deposited in the State Treasury pursuant to Section 11 of the act of Congress referred to in Section 8551 of this code and apportioned to any county or counties of this State as provided in this article, shall be expended by and within each of such counties, in equal shares, solely for the benefit of the public schools and county highways; and it shall be the duty of the county auditor of any county receiving a payment of such money immediately to credit the same as follows: 50 percent thereof to an account in the proper fund on his books earmarked and available solely for expenditures for the benefit of the public schools in such county, and 50 percent thereof to an account in the proper fund on his books earmarked and available solely for expenditures for county highways in such county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1881.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. KAPILOFF LAND BANK ACT [8600. - 8633.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [8600. - 8602.]

8600.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Kapiloff Land Bank Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8601.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this division.

(a) “Commission” means the State Lands Commission.

(b) “Fund” means the Land Bank Fund created pursuant to Section 8610.

(c) “Trustee” means the State Lands Commission acting in its role as trustee for the Land Bank Fund.

(d) “Title settlements” means exchanges pursuant to Sections 6307 and 6307.1 and any agreements between the commission and others as a part of, or in lieu of, litigation in compromise settlements of public trust title questions, including real property exchanges, boundary determinations, or other means leading to a resolution of those questions and the necessary conveyances or other documentation provided by the agreements.

(e) “Mitigation” means any measure to mitigate adverse environmental impacts that are lawfully imposed as a condition to the issuance of a permit or other authorization to undertake a project.

(f) “Project” means, for purposes of mitigation only, any improvement to real property that adversely impacts existing or former wetlands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 432, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Wetlands are essential to the environmental, economic, and social well-being of the people of the State of California.

(b) In many instances, uncertainty and disputes exist with respect to the existence or nonexistence of a public trust right, title, or interest within or along waterways of the state. This uncertainty results in impeding both the development of these lands by owners of the private property interests and preservation and public use of public trust lands, and, therefore, in the interest of protecting, enhancing, and preserving the public trust on the one hand, while permitting reasonable use and development where appropriate on the other hand, title settlements will result in the avoidance of substantial delays, uncertainties, and cost to all parties of protracted litigation, and constitute sound public policy.

(c) State policy requires the examination of mitigation measures for all projects having a potentially significant adverse impact on the environment.

(d) State law further requires the adoption of mitigation measures for projects having a significant impact on certain environmentally sensitive areas, including wetlands.

(e) So that projects can be expeditiously commenced and completed, it is in the state’s interest to facilitate their completion through the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Land Bank Fund [8610. - 8618.]

8610.

(a) There is in the State Treasury the Land Bank Fund, which fund is hereby created. All moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for expenditure, without regard to fiscal years, for the purposes of Section 8625. When performing the powers and duties set forth in this division, the commission shall be known as the Land Bank Trustee.

(b) (1) The Martins Beach Subaccount is hereby created in the fund. Moneys received from public or private sources, including nonprofit sources, to be used for the creation of a public access route to and along the shoreline, including the sandy beach, at Martins Beach at the South Cabrillo Highway pursuant to Section 6213.5 shall be deposited into the subaccount
 and be continuously appropriated to and expended by the commission to acquire that right-of-way or easement, either in accordance with the procedures set forth in Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or through a negotiated agreement, and for costs associated with that acquisition, including, but not limited to, environmental studies, analyses, and assessments, and associated improvements and maintenance costs, in accordance with the following priority:

(A) Moneys received from public or private sources, including nonprofit sources, that are deposited into the subaccount shall first be expended by the commission for the creation of that public access route, and any associated improvements and maintenance costs.

(B) The commission may also transfer moneys from the fund to the subaccount, not to exceed a maximum of one million dollars
 ($1,000,000), and expend those moneys for the creation of that public access route and associated improvements and maintenance costs, after moneys received pursuant to subparagraph (A) have been used.

(2) The commission may deposit into the subaccount and expend moneys received from the County of San Mateo pursuant to an appropriation by the county for the purposes of this subdivision.

(3) The commission may, pursuant to Section 6213.5, acquire the right-of-way or easement necessary for the creation of the public access route, as prescribed in paragraph (1). Nothing in this paragraph prevents the commission from acquiring the right-of-way or easement through a negotiated agreement.

(4) General Fund contributions to the subaccount shall be segregated and separately accounted for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 31.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8611.

The commission shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8612.

The trustee is authorized to acquire real property or any interest in real property for the purposes of facilitating title settlements and, with respect to a project requiring mitigation, to facilitate such mitigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8612.5.

The trustee is authorized to manage and improve real property for purposes of providing open space, habitat for plants and animals, and public access.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8613.

(a) Moneys in the fund shall be available for expenditure by the trustee to purchase outstanding interests in tide and submerged lands whether or not they have been filled, diked, or cut off from tidal waters, lands which have been or may be converted to wetlands, or adjoining or nearby lands where the public use and ownership of the land is necessary or extremely beneficial for furtherance of public trust purposes.

(b) Moneys deposited in the fund pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 8625 shall be available for expenditure by the trustee for management and improvement of real property held by the trustee to provide open space, habitat for plants and animals, and public access.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Land Bank Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the Land Bank Fund. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the Land Bank Fund was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 18.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

8614.

The acquisition and subsequent management of the real property shall be consistent with the San Francisco Bay Plan specified in Section 66603 of the Government Code, the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan as defined in Section 29113 of the Public Resources Code, and any land use plan of a local agency, including, but not limited to, a port district, regional park, park and open-space, or open-space district, or recreation and park district, whose jurisdiction includes in whole or in part the acquired real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8615.

The trustee shall act only at an open, scheduled public meeting, subject to all provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) relating to meetings of the commission. The trustee may combine its meetings with the meetings of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8616.

The provisions of this division are not intended as exclusive, and shall not restrict the commission in otherwise meeting its responsibilities for resolving title disputes in lieu of litigation or in settlement of litigation, in whole or in part, by land bank agreements, or otherwise, or any other responsibilities and jurisdiction the commission may presently have by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8617.

The trustee is authorized to accept gifts of real property or money for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8618.

(a) On or before January 2 of each year, the trustee shall prepare and submit to the Governor and the Legislature a report describing its progress in achieving the objectives of this division, including the status of property acquisitions and an accounting of the moneys in the fund.

(b) The report to the Legislature required pursuant to this section shall be prepared in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 14.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration [8620. - 8633.]

8620.

Acquisitions may be made by negotiated agreement with the owners of the outstanding interests. No provision of this division is intended to confer any authority to exercise the power of eminent domain for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8621.

The purchase price shall not exceed the fair market value of the outstanding interests to be acquired. Prior to any such acquisition the trustee shall review the evidence and applicable law and shall determine whether the state may have any right, title, or interest therein and deduct from the economic value of the acquisition the value of any such state interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8622.

As soon as practicable after initiating a title and parcel acceptability study for possible acquisition pursuant to this division, the trustee shall mail a “Notice of Potential Land Bank Acquisition” to the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, the State Coastal Conservancy, the district office of the United States Army Corps of Engineers for the district in which the real property is located, other persons, entities, or public agencies who have previously requested to be placed on the mailing list for the notices, and any others deemed appropriate by the trustee. The notice shall contain a “Plat of Potential Land Bank Parcel,” showing the approximate location, character, and size of the parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 15.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8623.

The trustee shall make all reasonable attempts to acquire the mineral and other subsurface rights in any acquisition pursuant to this division. In the event the trustee is unable to acquire the mineral and other subsurface rights, the trustee may purchase the parcel subject to the reserved subsurface rights upon the trustee expressly finding that: (1) a reasonable attempt has been made to acquire the subsurface rights without success, (2) it is unlikely that the subsurface rights can be acquired within the provisions of this division, (3) the outstanding subsurface rights are not likely to unreasonably damage or interfere with the contemplated public trust uses for the parcel, and (4) the public benefits to be derived from acquisition are so substantial that acquisition of the parcel without the subsurface rights is in the best interests of the state for the public purposes set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8624.

The trustee shall have the exclusive jurisdiction and authority to administer the fund and the interests in real property acquired pursuant to this division, including the selection, acquisition, and conveyance of real property by the trustee as provided in this division, provided that the trustee shall solicit and consider the comments and recommendations of other state, federal, and local public agencies and members of the public, prior to any such selection, acquisition, and conveyance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8625.

(a) The consideration passing to the state in title settlements may consist, in whole or in part, of monetary payments to the trustee for deposit into the fund that are subject to a statutory trust limiting their use exclusively to the purchase of interests in a Land Bank Fund parcel and conveyance of those interests to the state pursuant to Section 8626 as soon as practicable thereafter.

(b) A project applicant may donate moneys for deposit to the fund for purposes of mitigation with the approval of the agency responsible for approving the project and the trustee shall accept the donation if land is held by the trustee for those purposes. A donation so deposited is subject to a statutory trust limiting its use exclusively to
 the identified mitigation.

(c) Any party may deposit moneys into the fund for purposes of specified or unspecified projects to provide for access to or management and improvement of real property held by the trustee to provide open space, habitat for plants and animals, and public access.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 159, Sec. 2.   (SB 1488)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

8626.

Upon acceptance of a conveyance pursuant to Section 8627 the trustee shall thereafter convey to the state a parcel or other interest therein, whose economic value determined pursuant to Section 8621 is equal to the payment made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8627.

The state, in its sovereign capacity, shall accept any such conveyance, and the land shall thereafter be held by the state as land of the legal character of tide and submerged lands subject to the public trust under the jurisdiction of the commission pursuant to the provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 6001).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8628.

The commission shall accept the conveyances on the part of the state and shall authorize their acknowledgment and recordation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8629.

Until expended for acquisitions in accordance with the provisions of this division, moneys in the fund shall be deposited in the Pooled Money Investment Fund and the interest deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8630.

In addition to the purchase price to be paid, the costs and expenses attributable to the acquisition may be payable from the fund, provided that such costs shall not exceed 5 percent of the expended funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8631.

The provisions of this division shall not be subject to the provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (commencing with Section 21000 of the Public Resources Code), the Subdivision Map Act (commencing with Section 66410 of the Government Code), or the Property Acquisition Law (commencing with Section 15850 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8632.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to impair the ability of any other state agency from acquiring lands for wetlands restoration and enhancement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8633.

Nothing in this division relieves the trustee or its successors in interest from any requirement to obtain state permits, licenses, or approvals otherwise required for work, activities, or uses conducted on any real property acquired pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1471, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7.5. ARROYO SECO PARKLANDS [8650. - 8655.]

8650.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Arroyo Seco Parklands Preservation Law of 1975.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

8651.

“Arroyo Seco” means that streambed, ranging from 200 to 2,000 feet in width, from the Los Angeles River in the City of Los Angeles to Devil’s Gate Dam in the City of Pasadena.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

8652.

“Parklands” means the acreage designated as parklands by the Cities of Los Angeles, South Pasadena, and Pasadena prior to January 1, 1975, and includes wilderness areas, historic sites, established bridle trails, municipal golf courses, hiking trails, lawn bowling greens, tennis courts, children’s playgrounds, picnic areas, baseball diamonds, lighted areas for basketball, soccer, and football, a band shell, community buildings, an outdoor gym, casting pool, and an archery range.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

8653.

“Construction already underway” means all projects of the California Highway Commission for which agreements exist as of May 1, 1974.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

8654.

“Three acres for the Pasadena Freeway (State Highway Route 11) ramps” means the three acres to be taken for the proposed ramp improvement project on that freeway, as defined by a draft environmental impact report released in May 1974 by the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

8655.

With the exception of the construction already underway and the three acres for the Pasadena Freeway ramps, no portion of the parklands in, and adjacent to, the Arroyo Seco shall be taken or encroached upon for any state highway purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7.7. SCHOOL LANDS [8700. - 8723.]



CHAPTER 1. School Land Bank Act [8700. - 8716.]

8700.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the School Land Bank Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8701.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Past policies of the state have resulted in significant depletion of the inventory of lands granted by the federal government to provide fiscal support for the public school system.

(b) It is essential that all remaining school lands and attendant interests be managed and enhanced to provide an economic base for support of the public school system.

(c) The commission shall plan and implement all transactions, including exchanges, sales, and acquisitions which would facilitate the management of school land interests for revenue generating purposes.

(d) The state, through the commission, shall take all action necessary to fully develop school lands, indemnity interests, and attendant mineral interests into a permanent and productive resource base.

(e) It is in the best interest of the state that school lands be managed as a revenue source and it is the intent of the Legislature that fair market value be a primary criterion in determining if proposed uses or dispositions of land should be approved.

(f) The consolidation of school land parcels into contiguous holdings is essential to sound and effective management and the power to acquire lands by exchange or purchase is elemental to the consolidation process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8702.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this section govern the construction of this division.

(a) “Commission” means the State Lands Commission.

(b) “Fund” means the School Land Bank Fund.

(c) “School land” means land or interests in land granted to the state by an Act of Congress March 3, 1853 (Ch. 145, 10 Stat. 244), for the specific purpose of providing support for the public schools.

(d) “Trustee” means the State Lands Commission acting in its role as trustee for the School Land Bank
 Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8703.

Acquisitions may be made by negotiated agreement with, or purchase from, the owners of the outstanding interests. Nothing in this division confers any authority to exercise the power of eminent domain for the purposes of this division, although that power is statutorily vested in the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8704.

The trustee shall make all reasonable attempts to acquire the mineral and other subsurface rights in any acquisition pursuant to this division. If the trustee is unable to acquire the mineral and other subsurface rights, the trustee may purchase real property upon the trustee expressly finding that the benefits to be derived from the acquisition are substantial and that acquisition of the property without the subsurface rights is in the best interests of the state for the purposes set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8705.

The trustee has the exclusive jurisdiction and authority to administer the fund and the interest in real property acquired pursuant to this division, including the selection, acquisition, and conveyance of real property by the trustee as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8706.

The state, in its sovereign capacity, shall accept any conveyance, and the land shall thereafter be held by the state as land of the legal character of school lands subject to the school land trust under the jurisdiction of the commission pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 6001).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8707.

The commission shall accept the conveyances on the part of the state and shall authorize their acknowledgment and recordation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8708.

Until expended for acquisitions in accordance with this division, moneys in the fund shall be deposited in the Pooled Money Investment Fund and the interest deposited in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8709.

In addition to the purchase price to be paid, the costs and expenses attributable to the acquisition, including, but not limited to, the fees and expenses of appraisals, escrow, broker’s fees, title insurance, and other third-party costs, may be paid from the fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 715, Sec. 6.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8709.5.

Expenses attributable to management and remediation efforts on state school lands are payable from the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8710.

An action under this chapter is not subject to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code), or the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8711.

There is in the State Treasury the School Land Bank Fund, which is hereby created. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are appropriated to the commission for expenditure, without regard to fiscal years, for the purposes of this division. When performing the powers and duties set forth in this division, the commission shall be known as the School Land Bank Trustee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8712.

The trustee may acquire real property or any interest in real property with the objective of facilitating management of school lands for the purpose of generating revenue. The trustee may delegate authority to the trustee’s executive officer to make a nonrefundable downpayment for a potential acquisition of real property or any interest in real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 715, Sec. 7.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8713.

The trustee shall act only at an open, scheduled public meeting, subject to all provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 6001) relating to meetings of the commission. The trustee may combine its meeting with the meetings of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8715.

The provisions of this division are not intended as exclusive, and shall not restrict the commission in otherwise meeting any other responsibilities and jurisdiction the commission presently has by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8716.

The trustee may accept gifts of real property or money for the purposes of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Land Exchanges for Renewable Energy-Related Projects [8720. - 8723.]

8720.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The high cost of energy is taking a financial toll on California’s residents and economy, as well as making the state more dependent on foreign oil.

(b) California is home to abundant renewable energy resources, such as solar, wind, geothermal, and biomass.

(c) The State Lands Commission manages on behalf of the State Teachers’ Retirement Fund (STRS) hundreds of thousands of acres of school lands, a great deal of which have significant potential for siting large-scale renewable energy projects.

(d) The State Lands Commission has a duty pursuant to the School Land Bank Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 8700)) to take all action necessary to fully develop school lands into a permanent and productive resource base for the benefit of STRS.

(e) A significant amount of school lands are not producing revenue from large-scale renewable energy projects because they are isolated, landlocked parcels, the majority of which are remote desert lands. The consolidation of school land parcels into contiguous holdings would facilitate the sound and effective management of these lands for large-scale renewable energy projects.

(f) On October 16, 2008, the State Lands Commission adopted a resolution supporting the environmentally responsible development of school lands for renewable energy-related projects.

(g) If school lands are leased for large-scale renewable energy projects, the state will benefit in the form of reduced carbon emissions, a cleaner and healthier environment, affordable energy, stronger national security, new jobs, and more funding for STRS.

(h) It is the policy of the state to promote the advancement, development, assessment, and installation of large-scale renewable energy projects on school lands. Any consolidation and development of school lands for renewable energy should be done with assurances that the state’s unique and sensitive environment will be protected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (AB 982)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8721.
